Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1373.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; Pima county; summer youth employment program The sum of $250,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to distribute to Pima county for the summer youth employment program.